Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-439
Events causing dissolution and winding up of partnership business.

A partnership is dissolved, and its business must be wound up, only upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

(1) In a partnership at will, the partnership's having notice from a partner, other than a partner who is dissociated under subdivisions (2) through (10) of section 67-431, of that partner's express will to withdraw as a partner, or on a later date specified by the partner;

(2) In a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking:

(a) Within ninety days after a partner's dissociation by death or otherwise under subdivisions (6) through (10) of section 67-431 or wrongful dissociation under subsection (2) of section 67-432, the express will of at least a majority of the remaining partners to wind up the partnership business, for which purpose a partner's rightful dissociation pursuant to subdivision (2)(b)(i) of section 67-432 constitutes the expression of that partner's will to wind up the partnership business;

(b) The express will of all of the partners to wind up the partnership business; or

(c) The expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking;

(3) An event agreed to in the partnership agreement resulting in the winding up of the partnership business;

(4) An event that makes it unlawful for all or substantially all of the business of the partnership to be continued, but a cure of illegality within ninety days after notice to the partnership of the event is effective retroactively to the date of the event for purposes of this section;

(5) On application by a partner, a judicial determination that:

(a) The economic purpose of the partnership is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

(b) Another partner has engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner; or

(c) It is not otherwise reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the partnership agreement; or

(6) On application by a transferee of a partner's transferable interest, a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business:

(a) After the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, if the partnership was for a definite term or particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer; or

(b) At any time, if the partnership was a partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 39.

When grounds for both dissociation and dissolution of a partnership exist, a court may exercise its discretion to determine the appropriate remedy. Robertson v. Jacobs Cattle Co., 285 Neb. 859, 830 N.W.2d 191 (2013).

Dissolution of a partnership for a partner's voluntary withdrawal under subsection (1) of this section is a default rule that applies only when the partnership agreement does not provide for the partnership business to continue. Shoemaker v. Shoemaker, 275 Neb. 112, 745 N.W.2d 299 (2008).

The 1998 Uniform Partnership Act does not require remaining partners to strictly comply with a buyout provision in a partnership agreement to prevent dissolution upon the voluntary withdrawal of a partner; strict compliance is inconsistent with the act's provision of remedies for the withdrawing partner. Shoemaker v. Shoemaker, 275 Neb. 112, 745 N.W.2d 299 (2008).